Utah statutes.
59-10-537.   Interest on underpayment, nonpayment, or extension of time for
payment of tax.
(1) (a)  Subject to the other provisions of this section, if any amount of
income tax is not paid on or before the last date prescribed in this chapter
for payment, interest on the amount at the rate and in the manner prescribed
in Section 59-1-402 shall be paid.
(b)  Interest under this Subsection (1) may not be paid if the amount of the
interest is less than $1.
(c)  If the time for filing of a return of tax withheld by an employer is
extended, the employer shall pay interest for the period for which the
extension is granted and may not charge such interest to the employee.
(2)  If a deficiency or any interest or additional amount assessed in
connection with an amount under Subsection (1), or a penalty in case of a
delinquency provided for in Section 59-10-539 is not paid in full within ten
days from the date of notice and demand from the commission, there shall be
collected as part of the tax, interest at the rate and in the manner
prescribed in Section 59-1-402 from the date of the notice and demand until
the entire amount of the deficiency, interest, and additional amount is paid.
(3)  If the time for payment of the amount determined as the tax by the
taxpayer is extended under the authority of Section 59-10-522, interest shall
be collected as a part of the amount at the rate and in the manner prescribed
in Section 59-1-402.
